Washington statutes.
RCW 19.110.010

Legislative declaration.

The legislature finds and declares that the widespread and unregulated sale of business opportunities has become a common area of investment problems and deceptive practices in the state of Washington. As a result, the provisions of this chapter are necessary to counteract the potential negative impact of the sale of business opportunities upon the economy of the state.

[ 1981 c 155 s 1.]